Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Chapter 17. Amendments to Constitution by Voter Initiative

§ 23-17-1.
Procedures by which qualified electors may initiate proposed amendments to the constitution.

For purposes of this chapter, the following term shall have the meaning ascribed herein:

“Measure” means an amendment to the Mississippi Constitution proposed by a petition of qualified electors under Section 273, Mississippi Constitution of 1890.

If any qualified elector of the state desires to initiate a proposed amendment to the Constitution of this state as authorized by subsections (3) through (13) of Section 273 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890, he shall first file with the Secretary of State a typewritten copy of the proposed initiative measure, accompanied by an affidavit that the sponsor is a qualified elector of this state.

The sponsor of an initiative shall identify in the text of the initiative the amount and source of revenue required to implement the initiative. If the initiative requires a reduction in any source of government revenue, or a reallocation of funding from currently funded programs, the sponsor shall identify in the text of the initiative the program or programs whose funding must be reduced or eliminated to implement the initiative.

The person proposing the measure shall also include all the information required under Section 273, Mississippi Constitution of 1890.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 1, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-3.
Time for filing petition; length of time petition remains valid.

The petition for a proposed initiative measure must be filed with the Secretary of State not less than ninety (90) days before the first day of the regular session of the Legislature at which it is to be submitted. A petition is valid for a period of twelve (12) months.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 2, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-5.
Submission of proposed initiative to Attorney General; review; recommendations; certificate of review; filing of proposed initiative and certificate.

Upon receipt of any proposed initiative measure, the Secretary of State shall submit a copy of the proposed measure to the Attorney General and give notice to the person filing the proposed measure of such transmittal. Upon receipt of the measure, the Attorney General may confer with the person filing the proposed measure and shall within ten (10) working days from receipt thereof review the proposal for matters of form and style, and such matters of substantive import as may be agreeable to the person filing the proposed measure, and shall recommend such revision or alteration of the measure as may be deemed necessary and appropriate. The recommendations of the Attorney General shall be advisory only, and the person filing the proposed measure may accept or reject them in whole or in part. The Attorney General shall issue a certificate of review certifying that he has reviewed the measure for form and style and that the recommendations thereon, if any, have been communicated to the person filing the proposed measure, and such certificate shall issue whether or not the person filing the proposed measure accepts such recommendations. Within fifteen (15) working days after notification of submittal of the proposed initiative measure to the Attorney General, the person filing the proposed measure, if he desires to proceed with his sponsorship, shall file the measure together with the certificate of review with the Secretary of State for assignment of a serial number and the Secretary of State shall thereupon submit to the Attorney General a certified copy of the measure filed. Upon submitting the proposal to the Secretary of State for assignment of a serial number the Secretary of State shall refuse to make such assignment unless the proposal is accompanied by a certificate of review.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 3, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section); Laws, 1998, ch. 546, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 23-17-7.
Assignment of serial number; designation as “Initiative Measure No.
_________ .”

The Secretary of State shall give a serial number to each initiative measure, and forthwith transmit one (1) copy of the measure proposed bearing its serial number to the Attorney General. Thereafter, a measure shall be known and designated on all petitions, ballots and proceedings as “Initiative Measure No._______________ .”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 4, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-8.
Correction of certain nonsubstantive clerical or technical errors in the section number reference or designation of a proposed constitutional amendment.

When an amendment to the Mississippi Constitution of 1890 is proposed to the qualified electors of the state under the voter initiative procedure set forth in Section 23-17-1, et seq., the Secretary of State, with the approval of the Attorney General, may make a nonsubstantive clerical or technical correction in the section number reference or designation of the proposed amendment contained in an initiative measure, as may be appropriate or necessary in order to prevent the use of an existing section number or the possibility of the initiative being declared invalid only because of an error in the section number designation.Such a correction may be made at any time after the Attorney General’s certificate of review with regard to the initiative measure has been issued, and before the ballot for the initiative measure is printed.The provisions of this section do not authorize the Secretary of State to make any change other than a nonsubstantive correction in the section number reference or designation of the proposed amendment contained in the initiative measure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 304, § 1, eff July 28, 2011 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 23-17-9.
Formulation of ballot title and summary of initiative measure.

Within seven (7) calendar days after the receipt of an initiative measure, the Attorney General shall formulate and transmit to the Secretary of State a concise statement posed as a question and not to exceed twenty (20) words, bearing the serial number of the measure and a summary of the measure, not to exceed seventy-five (75) words, to follow the statement. The statement shall give a true and impartial statement of the purpose of the measure. Neither the statement nor the summary may intentionally be an argument, nor likely to create prejudice, either for or against the measure. Such concise statement shall constitute the ballot title. The ballot title formulated by the Attorney General shall be the ballot title of the measure unless changed on appeal. When practicable, the question posed by the ballot title shall be written in such a way that an affirmative answer to such question and an affirmative vote on the measure would result in a change in then current law, and a negative answer to the question and a negative vote on the measure would result in no change to then current law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 5, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-11.
Notice of ballot title and summary to initiator; publication of title and summary.

Upon the filing of the ballot title and summary for an initiative measure in his office, the Secretary of State shall forthwith notify by certified mail return receipt requested, the person proposing the measure and any other individuals who have made written request for such notification of the exact language of the ballot title. The Secretary of State shall publish the title and summary for an initiative measure within ten (10) days after filing such title and summary in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation throughout the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 6, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-13.
Procedure for appeal of title and summary.

If any person is dissatisfied with the ballot title or summary formulated by the Attorney General, he or she may, within five (5) days from the publications of the ballot title and summary by the office of the Secretary of State, appeal to the circuit court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County by petition setting forth the measure, the title or summary formulated by the Attorney General, and his or her objections to the ballot title or summary and requesting amendment of the title or summary by the court.

A copy of the petition on appeal together with a notice that an appeal has been taken shall be served upon the Secretary of State, upon the Attorney General and upon the person proposing the measure if the appeal is initiated by someone other than that person. Upon the filing of the petition on appeal or at the time to which the hearing may be adjourned by consent of the appellant, the court shall accord first priority to examining the proposed measure, the title or summary prepared by the Attorney General and the objections to that title or summary. The court may hear arguments, and, within ten (10) days, shall render its decision and file with the Secretary of State a certified copy of such ballot title or summary as it determines will meet the requirements of Section 23-17-9. The decision of the court shall be final.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 7, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-15.
Filing of instrument establishing title and summary of measure; notice to initiator; title and summary to be used in all proceedings.

When the ballot title and summary are finally established, the Secretary of State shall file the instrument establishing it with the proposed measure and transmit a copy thereof by certified mail return receipt requested, to the person proposing the measure and to any other individuals who have made written request for such notification. Thereafter such ballot title shall be the title of the measure in all petitions, ballots and other proceedings in relation thereto. The summary shall appear on all petitions directly following the ballot title.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 8, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-17.
Initiator of measure to print blank petitions; form of petitions.

The person proposing an initiative measure shall print blank petitions upon single sheets of paper of good writing quality not less than eight and one-half (8 1/2) inches in width and not less than fourteen (14) inches in length. Each sheet shall have a full, true and correct copy of the proposed measure referred to therein printed on the reverse side of the petition or attached thereto.

Only a person who is a qualified elector of this state may circulate a petition or obtain signatures on a petition.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 9; Laws, 1996, ch. 444, § 1, eff from and after June 28, 1996 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-17-19.
Secretary of State to design petitions; form of petitions.

The Secretary of State shall design the form each sheet of which shall contain the following:

“WARNING EVERY PERSON WHO SIGNS THIS PETITION WITH ANY OTHER THAN HIS OR HER TRUE NAME, KNOWINGLY SIGNS MORE THAN ONE OF THESE PETITIONS RELATING TO THE SAME INITIATIVE MEASURE, SIGNS THIS PETITION WHEN HE OR SHE IS NOT A QUALIFIED ELECTOR OR MAKES ANY FALSE STATEMENT ON THIS PETITION MAY BE PUNISHED BY FINE, IMPRISONMENT, OR BOTH. PETITION FOR INITIATIVE MEASURE To the Honorable , Secretary of State of the State of Mississippi: We, the undersigned citizens and qualified electors of the State of Mississippi, respectfully direct that this petition and the proposed measure known as Initiative Measure No. , entitled (here insert the established ballot title of the measure), a full, true and correct copy of which is printed or attached on the reverse side of this petition, be transmitted to the Legislature of the State of Mississippi at its next ensuing regular session, and we respectfully petition the Legislature to adopt the proposed measure; and each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition, I am a qualified elector of the State of Mississippi in the city (or town), county and congressional district written after my name, my residence address is correctly stated and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.”

Click to view

Each sheet shall also provide adequate space for the following information: Petitioner’s signature; print name for positive identification; residence address, street and number, if any; city or town; county; precinct; and congressional district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 10, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-21.
Certification of petition by the circuit clerk; fee for filing petition.

Before a person may file a petition with the Secretary of State, the petition must be certified by the circuit clerk of each county in which the petition was circulated. The circuit clerk shall certify the signatures of qualified electors of that county and shall state the total number of qualified electors signing the petition in that county. The circuit clerk shall verify the name of each qualified elector signing on each petition. A circuit clerk may not receive any fee, salary or compensation from any private person or private legal entity for the clerk’s duties in certifying an initiative petition. When the person proposing any initiative measure has secured upon the petition a number of signatures of qualified electors equal to or exceeding the minimum number required by Section 273(3) of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890 for the proposed measure, and such signatures have been certified by the circuit clerks of the various counties, he may submit the petition to the Secretary of State for filing. The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) from the person filing the petition to pay part of the administrative and publication costs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 11; Laws, 1996, ch. 444, § 4, eff from and after June 28, 1996 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-17-23.
Grounds for refusing to file initiative petition.

The Secretary of State shall refuse to file any initiative petition being submitted upon any of the following grounds:

That the petition is not in the form required by Section 23-17-19;

That the petition clearly bears insufficient signatures;

That one or more signatures appearing on the petition were obtained in violation of Section 23-17-17(2), Section 23-17-57(2) or Section 23-17-57(3);

That the time within which the petition may be filed has expired; or

That the petition is not accompanied by the filing fee provided for in Section 23-17-21.

In case of such refusal, the Secretary of State shall endorse on the petition the word “submitted” and the date, and retain the petition pending appeal.

If none of the grounds for refusal exists, the Secretary of State shall accept and file the petition.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 12; Laws, 1996, ch. 444, § 3, eff from and after June 28, 1996 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-17-25.
Procedure to compel Secretary of State to file petition.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file an initiative petition when submitted to him for filing, the person submitting it for filing, within ten (10) days after his refusal, may apply to the Supreme Court for an order requiring the Secretary of State to bring the petition before the court and for a writ of mandamus to compel him to file it. The application shall be considered an emergency matter of public concern and shall be heard and determined with all convenient speed. If the Supreme Court decides that the petition is legal in form, apparently contains the requisite number of signatures of qualified electors, was filed within the time prescribed in the Constitution and was accompanied with the proper filing fee, it shall issue its mandate directing the Secretary of State to file the petition in his office as of the date of submission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 13, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-27.
Failure to appeal, or loss of appeal of, Secretary’s refusal to file petition.

If no appeal is taken from the refusal of the Secretary of State to file a petition within the time prescribed, or if an appeal is taken and the Secretary of State is not required to file the petition by the mandate of the Supreme Court, the Secretary of State shall destroy it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 14, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-29.
Filing petition with Legislature; adoption, amendment, or rejection of initiative; placement of initiative on ballot; approval of conflicting initiatives.

The Secretary of State shall file with the Clerk of the House and the Secretary of the Senate on the first day of the regular legislative session the complete text of each initiative for which a petition has been certified and filed with him. A constitutional initiative may be adopted or amended by a majority vote of each house of the Legislature. If the initiative is adopted, amended or rejected by the Legislature; or if no action is taken within four (4) months of the date that the initiative is filed with the Legislature, the Secretary of State shall place the initiative on the ballot for the next statewide general election. If the Legislature amends an initiative, the amended version and the original initiative shall be submitted to the electors. An initiative or legislative alternative must receive a majority of the votes thereon and not less than forty percent (40%) of the total votes cast at the election at which the measure was submitted to be approved. If conflicting initiatives or legislative alternatives are approved at the same election, the initiative or legislative alternative receiving the highest number of affirmative votes shall prevail.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 15, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-31.
Procedure for rejection of measure and adoption of new measure by Legislature; designation of “Alternative Measure No.
_________
A”; fiscal analysis.

Whenever the Legislature rejects a measure submitted to it by initiative petition and adopts an amendment to the measure proposed by initiative petition, then the Secretary of State shall give the measure adopted by the Legislature the same number as that borne by the initiative measure followed by the letter “A.” Such measure so designated as “Alternative Measure No._______________A,” together with the ballot title thereof, when ascertained, shall be certified by the Secretary of State to the county election commissioners for printing on the ballots for submission to the voters for their approval or rejection at the next statewide general election.

The chief legislative budget officer shall prepare a fiscal analysis of each initiative and each legislative alternative. A summary of each fiscal analysis shall appear on the ballot.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 16, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-33.
Ballot title and summary for alternative measures.

For a measure designated by him as “Alternative Measure No._______________A,” the Secretary of State shall obtain from the Attorney General a ballot title in the manner provided by Section 23-17-9. The ballot title therefor shall be different from the ballot title of the measure in lieu of which it is proposed, and shall indicate, as clearly as possible, the essential differences in the measure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 17, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-35.
Form of initiative measure as appearing on ballot.

Except in the case of alternative voting on a measure initiated by petition, each measure submitted to the people for approval or rejection shall be so printed on the ballot, under the proper heading, that a voter can, by making one (1) choice, express his approval or rejection of such measure. Substantially the following form shall be a compliance with this section:

INITIATIVE MEASURE NO. (Here insert the ballot title of the measure.) YES
( ) NO

Click to view

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 18, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-37.
Voting for initiative when legislative alternative proposed; form of initiative measure and Legislative alternative as appearing on ballot.

If an initiative measure proposed to the Legislature has been rejected by the Legislature and an alternative measure is passed by the Legislature in lieu thereof, the serial numbers and ballot titles of both such measures shall be printed on the official ballots so that a voter can express separately two (2) preferences: First, by voting for the approval of either measure or against both measures, and, secondly, by voting for one measure or the other measure. If the majority of those voting on the first issue is against both measures, then both measures fail, but in that case the votes on the second issue nevertheless shall be carefully counted and made public. If a majority voting on the first issue is for the approval of either measure, then the measure receiving a majority of the votes on the second issue and also receiving not less than forty percent (40%) of the total votes cast at the election at which the measure was submitted for approval shall be law. Any person who votes against both measures on the first issue may vote but shall not be required to vote for any of the measures on the second issue in order for the ballot to be valid. Substantially the following form shall be a compliance with this section:

INITIATED BY PETITION AND ALTERNATIVE BY LEGISLATURE Initiative Measure No. , entitled (here insert the ballot title of the initiative measure). Alternative Measure No. A, entitled (here insert the ballot title of the alternative measure). VOTE FOR APPROVAL OF EITHER, OR AGAINST BOTH: FOR APPROVAL OF EITHER Initiative No. OR Alternative No. A ( ) AGAINST BOTH initiative No. AND Alternative No. A ( ) AND VOTE FOR ONE: FOR Initiative Measure No. ( ) FOR Alternative Measure No. A ( )

Click to view

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 19, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-39.
Limit of how many initiative proposals may be submitted to voters on single ballot.

No more than five (5) initiative proposals shall be submitted to the voters on a single ballot, and the first five (5) initiative proposals submitted to the Secretary of State with sufficient petitions shall be the proposals which are submitted to the voters.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 20, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-41.
Effective date of initiative which is approved.

An initiative approved by the electors shall take effect thirty (30) days from the date of the official declaration of the vote by the Secretary of State, unless the measure provides otherwise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 21, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-43.
Time limit for resubmitting initiative rejected by voters.

If any amendment to the Constitution proposed by initiative petition is rejected by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon, no initiative petition proposing the same, or substantially the same, amendment shall be submitted to the electors for at least two (2) years after the date of the election on such amendment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 22, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-45.
Publication of initiatives and Legislative Alternatives; inclusion of arguments or explanation; public hearing; notice of hearing.

A pamphlet containing a copy of all initiative measures and legislative alternatives, including the ballot title and ballot summary, arguments or explanations for and against each measure and alternative and the fiscal analysis prepared by the chief legislative budget officer shall be compiled by the Secretary of State. The sponsor may prepare the argument or explanation on the measure. If the sponsor does not prepare the argument or explanation, then the Secretary of State shall do so. Each argument or explanation shall not exceed three hundred (300) words. The Secretary of State shall publish the ballot title, ballot summary, full text of each measure and arguments or explanations for and against each measure and alternative once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks immediately preceding the election in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation in each county of the state. The costs of such printing and publication shall be borne by the Secretary of State from funds appropriated by the Legislature.

The Secretary of State shall conduct at least one (1) public hearing in each congressional district on each measure to be placed on the ballot and shall give public notice thereof at least thirty (30) days before a hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 23, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-47.
Definitions applicable to §§ 23-17-47 through 23-17-59.

For the purposes of Sections 23-17-47 through 23-17-59, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:

“Contribution” means any gift, subscription, loan, advance, money or anything of value made by a person or political committee for the purpose of influencing the passage or defeat of a measure on the ballot, for the purpose of obtaining signatures for the proposed ballot measures and attempting to place the proposed measure on the ballot, and for the purpose of opposing efforts to place a proposed measure on the ballot; but does not include noncompensated, nonreimbursed volunteer personal services.

“Person” means any individual, family, firm, corporation, partnership, association or other legal entity.

“Political committee” means any person, other than an individual, who receives contributions or makes expenditures for the purpose of influencing the passage or defeat of a measure on the ballot.

“Expenditure” means any purchase, payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, gift of money or anything of value, made by any person or political committee for the purpose of influencing any balloted measure, for the purpose of obtaining signatures for a proposed ballot measure and attempting to place the proposed measure on the ballot, and for the purpose of opposing efforts to place a proposed measure on the ballot.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 24; Laws, 1999, ch. 301, § 17, eff from and after January 15, 1999 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-17-49.
Statement of organization of political committees; when to file; contents of statement; changes in statement.

Each political committee shall file with the Secretary of State a statement of organization no later than ten (10) days after receipt of contributions aggregating in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), or no later than ten (10) days after having made expenditures aggregating in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00).

The statement of organization of a political committee must include:

The name and address of the committee and all officers;

Designation of a director of the committee and a custodian of books and accounts of the committee, who shall be designated treasurer; and

A brief statement identifying the measure that the committee seeks to pass or defeat.

Any change in information previously submitted in a statement of organization shall be reported and filed within ten (10) days.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 25, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-51.
Political committees and certain individuals to file financial reports; when to file; penalties.

A political committee that either receives contributions or makes expenditures in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) shall file financial reports with the Secretary of State.

An individual person who on his or her own behalf expends in excess of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for the purpose of influencing the passage or defeat of a measure shall file financial reports with the Secretary of State.

The financial reports required in this section shall be filed monthly, not later than the tenth day of the month following the month being reported, after a political committee or an individual exceeds the contribution or expenditure limits. Financial reports must continue to be filed until all contributions and expenditures cease. In all cases a financial report shall be filed thirty (30) days following the election on a measure.

Any person, who violates the provisions of this section, shall be subject to a fine as provided in Section 23-15-813.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 26; Laws, 1999, ch. 301, § 18, eff from and after January 15, 1999 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-17-53.
Content of financial reports.

A financial report of a political committee, or an individual person, as required by Section 23-17-51, shall contain the following information:

The name, address and telephone number of the committee or individual person filing the statement.

For a political committee:

The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the financial report;

The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the financial report;

The cumulative amount of those totals for each measure;

The balance of cash and cash equivalents on hand at the beginning and the end of the period covered by the financial report;

The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the financial report from persons who contributed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) or less, and the cumulative amount of that total for each measure;

The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the financial report from persons who contributed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) or more, and the cumulative amount of that total for each measure; and

The name and street address of each person from whom a contribution(s) exceeding Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) was received during the period covered by the financial report, together with the amount contributed, the date of receipt, and the cumulative amount contributed by that person for each measure.

For an individual person:

The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the financial report;

The cumulative amount of that total for each measure; and

The name and street address of each person to whom expenditures totaling Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) or more were made, together with the amount of each separate expenditure to each person during the period covered by the financial report and the purpose of the expenditure.

The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the financial report, the cumulative amount of that total for each measure, and the name and street address of each person who contributed more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) and the amount contributed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 27, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-55.
Required distance from polling place for distributing or posting material concerning initiative measure.

It is unlawful for any person to distribute or post material in support of or in opposition to a measure within one hundred fifty (150) feet of any entrance to a polling place where the election is held.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 28, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-57.
Unlawful to give or offer consideration to elector.

It is unlawful for a person to give or offer any consideration to an elector to induce the elector to vote for or against a measure.

It is unlawful for a person to give or offer any consideration to an elector to induce the elector to sign or not sign a petition for a measure.

It is unlawful for any person that pays or compensates another person for circulating a petition or for obtaining signatures on a petition to base the pay or compensation on the number of petitions circulated or the number of signatures obtained.

It is unlawful for any person to solicit signatures on any petition under this chapter within one hundred fifty (150) feet of any polling place on any election day.

It is unlawful for any person who circulates or causes to be circulated an initiative petition to obtain or attempt to obtain a person’s signature (a) by intentionally misleading such person as to the substance or effect of the petition, or (b) by intentionally causing such person to be misled as to the substance or effect of the petition.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 29; Laws, 1996, ch. 444, § 2, eff from and after June 28, 1996 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-17-59.
Unlawful to interfere with or influence vote of elector.

It is unlawful for a person to interfere with or influence the vote of an elector on a measure by means of violence, threats, intimidation, enforcing the payment of a debt, bringing a suit or criminal prosecution, any threat or action affecting a person’s conditions of employment or other corrupt means.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 30, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).

§ 23-17-60.
Removal of name from initiative petition due to fraud or coercion.

Any person who alleges that his or her signature on an initiative petition was obtained as the result of fraud or coercion, or that the person was intentionally misled as to the substance or effect of the petition, may have his or her signature removed from the initiative petition upon filing an affidavit to such effect with the Secretary of State anytime before the Secretary of State has accepted and filed the petition under Section 23-17-23.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 444, § 5, eff from and after June 28, 1996 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-17-61.
Penalties for violating §§ 23-17-49 through 23-17-59.

Any violation of Sections 23-17-49 through 23-17-59 is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 514, § 31, eff from and after August 3, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the creation of this section).